Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Generalities

5.005.
Actions to challenge constitutionality of legislative districts — Parties.

An action challenging the constitutionality of any legislative district created by this chapter shall be brought in the Circuit Court of the county where the plaintiff resides.

The Secretary of State shall be named as a defendant in any action challenging the constitutionality of any legislative district created by this chapter.

The Legislative Research Commission may intervene as a matter of right in any action challenging the constitutionality of any legislative district created by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 1, § 103, effective January 11, 1996; 1996, ch. 2, § 41, effective January 11, 1996; 2019 ch. 122, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 6, § 1, effective January 18, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/96). The text contained in this statute was enacted identically in two separate Acts of the 1996 Regular Session which have been codified together.

5.010.
Explanation of sources — Official maps.

For the purpose of this chapter:

The boundaries of the legislative districts created by this chapter shall be those shown on the maps generated by the Legislative Research Commission’s geographic information system to accompany a redistricting plan enacted into law. The official copies of these maps shall be on file with the State Board of Elections. A duplicate set of maps and associated population information shall be retained by the Legislative Research Commission.

Designated precincts are those precincts in existence on January 1, 2020. Precinct boundaries shown in the maps referred to in subsection (1) of this section are taken from county precinct maps and verified and corrected by the Legislative Research Commission staff in consultation with county election officials.

Census tracts and blocks shown in the maps referred to in subsection (1) of this section are those utilized for the making of the 2020 United States Census.

Population data utilized for redistricting is the 2020 United States Census Pub. L. 94-171 population data that was deemed to be official by the United States Secretary of Commerce on or before July 15, 2021, and election precinct population data prepared by the Legislative Research Commission staff from the official Pub. L. 94-171 population data.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 40, effective January 8, 1992; 1991 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 102, effective January 8, 1992; Acts 1992, ch. 369, § 7, effective January 1, 1993; 1995 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 39, effective November 3, 1995; 1996, ch. 1, § 101, effective January 11, 1996; 1996, ch. 2, § 39, effective January 11, 1996; Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 146, effective January 31, 2002; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 139, effective August 23, 2013; 2022 ch. 7, § 101, effective January 20, 2022; 2022 ch. 9, § 39, effective January 21, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/21/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 7 and 9, which are identical and have been codified together.

5.020.
Redrawing of precinct boundaries — Directions to county boards of elections. [Repealed.]

5.030.
Redrawing of precinct boundaries — Directions to county boards of elections. [Repealed.]

5.031.
Review and redrawing of precinct boundaries for legislative districts following 1996 Regular Session redistricting.

County boards of elections shall meet, immediately following January 11, 1996, for the purpose of reviewing the changes made to legislative district boundaries. The county boards of elections shall redraw precinct boundaries so as to conform to state legislative district boundaries established by the General Assembly in its 1996 Regular Session in order to minimize the number of split precincts. Any redrawing of precinct boundaries required as a result of this redistricting shall be completed no later than forty-five (45) days after January 11, 1996, the provisions of KRS 117.055(3) notwithstanding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 1, § 102, effective January 11, 1996; 1996, ch. 2, § 40, effective January 11, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/96). The text contained in this statute was enacted identically in two separate Acts of the 1996 Regular Session which have been codified together.